North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50A. Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act and Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.
Part 2. Agreement Addressing Custodial Responsibility During Deployment.

§ 50A-360.
Form of agreement.

The parents of a child may enter into a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility during deployment.

An agreement under subsection (a) of this section shall be (i) in writing and (ii) signed by both parents or any nonparent to whom custodial responsibility is granted.

An agreement under subsection (a) of this section may include the following:

To the extent feasible, identify the destination, duration, and conditions of the deployment that is the basis for the agreement.

Specify the allocation of caretaking authority among the deploying parent, the other parent, and any nonparent, if applicable.

Specify any decision-making authority that accompanies a grant of caretaking authority.

Specify any grant of limited contact to a nonparent.

If the agreement shares custodial responsibility between the other parent and a nonparent, or between two nonparents, provide a process to resolve any dispute that may arise.

Specify (i) the frequency, duration, and means, including electronic means, by which the deploying parent will have contact with the child; (ii) any role to be played by the other parent in facilitating the contact; and (iii) the allocation of any costs of communications.

Specify the contact between the deploying parent and child during the time the deploying parent is on leave or is otherwise available.

Acknowledge that any party’s existing child-support obligation cannot be modified by the agreement, and that changing the terms of the obligation during deployment requires modification in the appropriate court.

Provide that the agreement terminates following the deploying parent’s return from deployment according to the procedures under Part 4 of this Article.

If the agreement must be filed pursuant to

G.S. 50A-364

, specify which parent shall file the agreement.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-361.
Nature of authority created by agreement.

An agreement under this Part is temporary and terminates pursuant to Part 4 of this Article following the return from deployment of the deployed parent, unless the agreement has been terminated before that time by court order or modification of the agreement under

G.S. 50A-362

. The agreement derives from the parents’ custodial responsibility and does not create an independent, continuing right to caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact in an individual to whom custodial responsibility is given.

A nonparent given caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact by an agreement under this Part has standing to enforce the agreement until it has been modified pursuant to an agreement of the parents under

G.S. 50A-362

or terminated under Part 4 of this Article or by court order.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-362.
Modification of agreement.

The parents may by mutual consent modify an agreement regarding custodial responsibility made pursuant to this Part. If an agreement made under this subsection is modified before deployment of a deploying parent, the modification shall be in writing and signed by both parents and any nonparent who will exercise custodial responsibility under the modified agreement. If an agreement made under this section is modified during deployment of a deploying parent, the modification shall be agreed to, in a record, by both parents and any nonparent who will exercise custodial responsibility under the modified agreement.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-363.
Power of attorney.

If no other parent possesses custodial responsibility or if an existing court order prohibits contact between the child and the other parent, a deploying parent, by power of attorney, may delegate all or part of custodial responsibility to an adult nonparent for the period of deployment. The power of attorney is revocable by the deploying parent through a revocation of the power of attorney signed by the deploying parent.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-364.
Filing agreement or power of attorney with court.

An agreement or power of attorney created pursuant to this Part shall be filed within a reasonable period of time with any court that has entered an existing order on custodial responsibility or child support concerning the child. The case number and heading of the existing case concerning custodial responsibility or child support shall be provided to the court with the agreement or power of attorney.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§§ 50A-365 through 50A-369.

Reserved for future codification purposes.